Georgia, session 2025_26, SB20.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
S. B. 20
- 1 -

LC 61 0138S (SCS)
SECTION 1.
Article 7 of Chapter 3 of Title 20 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
scholarships, loans, and grants, is amended by revising Code Section 20-3-518.1, relating to
definitions relative to state veterinary education, as follows:
"20-3-518.1.
As used in this part, the term:
(1) 'Animal shelter,' 'nonprofit pet sterilization clinic,' 'pet sterilization services,' and
'shelter medicine' shall have the same meanings as set forth in Code Section 20-3-518.8.
(2) 'Board' means the State Veterinary Education Board created under Code
Section 20-3-518.2.
(2)(3) 'Commissioner' means the Commissioner of Agriculture.
(3)(4) 'Department' means the Department of Agriculture."
SECTION 2.
Said article is further amended by revising Code Section 20-3-518.2, relating to State
Veterinarian Education Board, as follows:
"20-3-518.2.
(a) There shall be a State Veterinary Education Board which shall consist of:
(1) The Commissioner of Agriculture or his or her designee;
(2) The dean of the College of Veterinary Medicine of the University of Georgia or his
or her designee;
(3) The dean of the College of Agricultural and Environmental Sciences of the
University of Georgia or his or her designee;
(4) A person actively engaged in the production of livestock in this state, to be appointed
by the Governor, who shall serve for a term of four years and until his or her successor
is qualified and appointed. The term of the initial member appointed under this
paragraph shall commence on July 1, 2011; and
S. B. 20
- 2 -

LC 61 0138S (SCS)
(5) A person actively engaged in the private practice of veterinary medicine in this state,
whose practice includes but is not necessarily limited to food animals, to be appointed by
the State Board of Veterinary Medicine, who shall serve for a term of four years and until
his or her successor is qualified and appointed. The term of the initial member appointed
under this paragraph shall commence on July 1, 2011.;
(6) A person employed as an executive director or equivalent of an animal shelter or a
nonprofit pet sterilization clinic in this state, to be appointed by the Governor, who shall
serve for a term of four years and until his or her successor is qualified and appointed.
The term of the initial member appointed under this paragraph shall commence on
January 1, 2026; and
(7) A veterinarian employed full time in the practice of shelter medicine or pet
sterilization services in this state, to be appointed by the Governor, who shall serve for
a term of four years and until his or her successor is qualified and appointed. The term
of the initial member appointed under this paragraph shall commence on January 1, 2026.
(b) Any vacancies on the board shall be filled in the same manner as the original
appointment.
(c)(1) The board shall elect annually a chairperson and a vice chairperson to serve in the
absence or inability of the chairperson. The board shall meet at least once each year at
such time and place as may be fixed by the board. Special meetings shall be held upon
the call of the chairperson. Three A majority of the members of the board shall constitute
a quorum for the transaction of business. No Except as otherwise provided in this
subsection, no official action shall be taken by the board except upon the affirmative vote
of at least three a majority of the members of the board.
(2)(A) The board shall be authorized to establish a committee, consisting of two or
more members of the board, which, to the extent provided by the board, shall have and
exercise the authority of the board in regard to the loan purchases provided for in this
part.
S. B. 20
- 3 -

LC 61 0138S (SCS)
(B) The board shall be authorized to establish a committee which, to the extent
provided by the board, shall have and exercise the authority of the board in regard to
the loan purchases provided for in Part 6B of this article.
(d) The board shall be attached to the Department of Agriculture for administrative
purposes only, pursuant to Code Section 50-4-3.
(e) The board shall establish and maintain separate programs for loan purchases made
under this part and loan purchases made under Part 6B of this article and shall account
separately for the funding of each program. Any state appropriation of funds shall
separately identify the amount of funds appropriated for each program."
SECTION 3.
Said article is further amended by adding a new part to read as follows:
"Part 6B
20-3-518.8.
As used in this part, the term:
(1) 'Animal shelter' shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section 4-11-2.
(2) 'Board' means the State Veterinary Education Board created under Code
Section 20-3-518.2.
(3) 'Nonprofit organization' means an organization which is exempt from taxation under
the provisions of Section 501(c)(3) of the United States Internal Revenue Code.
(4) 'Nonprofit pet sterilization clinic' means a veterinary facility that exclusively offers
pet sterilization services and which is a nonprofit organization.
(5) 'Pet sterilization services' means procedures that meet or exceed veterinary medical
standards of care in providing sterilization of dogs, cats, and pet rabbits.
S. B. 20
- 4 -

LC 61 0138S (SCS)
(6) 'Shelter medicine' means veterinary practices used to manage the health of
populations of animals handled by animal shelters.
(7) 'Veterinary facility' shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code
Section 43-50-3.
20-3-518.9.
(a) Beginning January 1, 2026, the board may provide for the purchase of loans made to
students for educational purposes who have completed a program of study in the field of
doctor of veterinary medicine or its equivalent and are authorized to practice veterinary
medicine in this state and are residents of this state, with services in the form of the practice
of veterinary medicine while residing in this state to be rendered as consideration for such
100 loan purchases.
101 (b) Only persons who have been practicing veterinary medicine for ten years or less shall
102 be eligible for loan purchases under this part.
103 (c) Only persons who practice shelter medicine full time or who practice full time at a
104 nonprofit pet sterilization clinic shall be eligible for loan purchases under this part.
105 (d) For eligible applicants who practice shelter medicine full time, the board shall give
106 priority to applicants whose practices include pet sterilization services.
107 20-3-518.10.
108 (a)(1) Subject to appropriations, persons whose applications are approved and enter into
109 a loan purchase agreement with the board, as provided by Code Section 20-3-518.9, shall
110 receive a loan purchase in a total amount to be determined by the board, but not
111 exceeding $75,000.00 per person. The loan purchases shall be paid in such manner as the
112 board shall determine.
113 (2) The loan purchases to be granted to each applicant shall be based upon the condition
114 that the consideration for such loan purchases shall be services to be rendered by the
S. B. 20
- 5 -

LC 61 0138S (SCS)
115 applicant after entering into a loan purchase agreement with the board by practicing his
116 or her profession full time in a board approved animal shelter or nonprofit pet sterilization
117 clinic.
118 (3) For time served after entering into a loan purchase agreement with the board in
119 practicing his or her profession full time in an animal shelter or nonprofit pet sterilization
120 clinic, the applicant shall receive a loan purchase at a rate equivalent to $25,000.00 per 12
121 months of service; provided, however, that the total purchase amount shall not exceed the
122 maximum specified in paragraph (1) of this subsection.
123 (b) The board shall not enter into new loan purchase agreements with more than four
124 persons per year for shelter medicine or nonprofit pet sterilization services; provided,
125 however, that the total sum of loan purchases from state appropriations for which the board
126 contractually obligates itself in any fiscal year shall not exceed the amount of funds for
127 such loan purchase agreements specified in annual appropriations Acts. Funds in the loan
128 purchase fund account that are not expended or contractually obligated by the board for
129 loan purchases during any fiscal year shall lapse.
130 20-3-518.11.
131 (a) Before being granted a loan purchase, each applicant shall enter into a contract with
132 the board for a term of three consecutive years agreeing to the terms and conditions upon
133 which the loan purchase is granted, including such terms and provisions as will carry out
134 the full purpose and intent of this part. No person shall be eligible to receive such loan
135 purchase more than once during his or her lifetime. The form of such contract shall be
136 prepared and approved by the Attorney General, and each contract shall be signed by the
137 chairperson of the board and by the applicant.
138 (b) The board shall have the authority to cancel the loan purchase contract of any applicant
139 at any time for any cause deemed sufficient by the board, provided that such authority shall
140 not be arbitrarily or unreasonably exercised.
S. B. 20
- 6 -

LC 61 0138S (SCS)
141 (c) The board shall adopt such rules and regulations as are reasonable and necessary to
142 implement the provisions of this part."
143 SECTION 4.
144 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 20
- 7 -